src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-A-ikakomimm_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Verb - ikakomimm - ok : # -m animate transitive verb, love AEW NA1
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitsikakomimmo
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitsikakomimmawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4SgO: nitsikakomimmayini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitsikakomimmoki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitsikakomimmawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4SgO: kitsikakomimmayini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitsikakomimmoka
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kitsikakomimmoka
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4SgO: ikakomimmiiwa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3SgO: otsikakomimmoka
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2SgO: kitsikakomimmokini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1SgO: nitsikakomimmokini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: ikakomimmiiyii
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4SgO: otsikakomimmokini
     
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitsikakomimmohpinnaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nitsikakomimmannaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4PlO: nitsikakomimmannaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: ikakomimmayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4PlO: ikakomimmayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitsikakomimmokihpinnaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kitsikakomimmawaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4PlO: kitsikakomimmawaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nitsikakomimmokinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kitsikakomimmokoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4PlO: ikakomimmiiyi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1PlO: nitsikakomimmokinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2PlO: kitsikakomimmokoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3PlO: otsikakomimmokoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: ikakomimmiiyi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4PlO: otsikakomimmokoaayini
     
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kitsikakomimmohpinnaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nitsikakomimmannaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4SgO: nitsikakomimmannaanini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO: ikakomimmawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4SgO: ikakomimmayini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kitsikakomimmokihpoaawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kitsikakomimmawaawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4SgO: kitsikakomimmawaayini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: nitsikakomimmoki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kitsikakomimmoki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4SgO: ikakomimmiiyi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1SgO: nitsikakomimmoki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2SgO: kitsikakomimmoki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3SgO: otsikakomimmoka

     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kitsikakomimmohpoaawa     
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nitsikakomimmayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4PlO: nitsikakomimmayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kitsikakomimmokihpinnaana    
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kitsikakomimmayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4PlO: kitsikakomimmayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1PlO: nitsikakomimmokinnaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kitsikakomimmokoaawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4PlO: ikakomimmiiwa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1PlO: nitsikakomimmokinnaanini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2PlO: kitsikakomimmokoaayini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3PlO: otsikakomimmokoaayi
 
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1SgO: nitsikakomimmokoo
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1PlO: nitsikakomimmotsspinnaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2SgO: kitsikakomimmokoo
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2PlO: kitsikakomimmotsspoaawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+21PlO: ikakomimmotssp
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: ikakomimmawa
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3PlO: ikakomimmayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4SgO: ikakomimmayini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4PlO: ikakomimmayi

     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: kitsikakomimmohsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: nitsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4SgO: nitsikakomimmahsini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: kitsikakomimmokssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: kitsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4SgO: kitsikakomimmahsini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: nitsikakomimmssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: kitsikakomimmssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4SgO: otsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3SgO: otsikakomimmssi

     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: kitsikakomimmohsoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: nitsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4PlO: nitsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: kitsikakomimmokssinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: kitsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4PlO: kitsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: nitsikakomimmssinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: kitsikakomimmssoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4PlO: otsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3PlO: otsikakomimmssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+4PlO: otsikakomimmssi

     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: kitsikakomimmohsinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: nitsikakomimmahsinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4PlO: nitsikakomimmahsinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3PlO: ikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4PlO: ikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: kitsikakomimmokssinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: kitsikakomimmahsoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4PlO: kitsikakomimmahsoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: nitsikakomimmssinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+21PlO: nitsikakomimmokssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: kitsikakomimmssoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4PlO: otsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+4PlO: otsikakomimmssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3PlO: otsikakomimmssi

     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: kitsikakomimmohsinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: nitsikakomimmahsinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4SgO: nitsikakomimmahsinnaanini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3SgO: ikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4SgO: ikakomimmahsini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: kitsikakomimmokssoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: kitsikakomimmahsoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4SgO: kitsikakomimmahsoaayini
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: nitsikakomimmssinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: kitsikakomimmssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4SgO: otsikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3SgO: otsikakomimmssi

     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1SgO: nitsikakomimmokoohsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1PlO: nitsikakomimmotssinnaani
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2SgO: kitsikakomimmokoohsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2PlO: kitsikakomimmotssoaayi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+21PlO: ikakomimmotssi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3SgO: ikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3PlO: ikakomimmahsi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+4SgO: ikakomimmahsini

     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2SgO: ikakomimminiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: ikakomimmainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1SgO: ikakomimmokiiniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: ikakomimmainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: ikakomimmotsiiniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: ikakomimmotsiiniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4SgO: ikakomimmasi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3SgO: ikakomimmotsiiniki

     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2PlO: ikakomimminoainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: ikakomimmainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1PlO: ikakomimmokinnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: ikakomimmainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: ikakomimmotsiinnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+21PlO: ikakomimmokisi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: ikakomimmotsiinoainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4PlO: ikakomimmasi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3PlO: ikakomimmotsiinoainiki

     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+2PlO: ikakomimminnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+3PlO: ikakomimmainnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+1PlO: ikakomimmokinnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+3PlO: ikakomimmainainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+21PlO: ikakomimmokisi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+2PlO: ikakomimmotsiinoainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+4PlO: ikakomimmasi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Pl+3PlO: ikakomimmotsiinoainiki

     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+2SgO: ikakomimminnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+3SgO: ikakomimmainnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+21Pl+3SgO: ikakomimmahki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+1SgO: ikakomimmokiinoainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+3SgO: ikakomimmainoainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+1SgO: ikakomimmotsiiniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+2SgO: ikakomimmotsiiniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+4SgO: ikakomimmasi
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Pl+3SgO: ikakomimmotsiiniki

     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1SgO: ikakomimmokoiniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1PlO: ikakomimmokoinnaaniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2SgO: ikakomimmokoiniki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2PlO: ikakomimmokoinoainiki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+21PlO: ikakomimmotsski
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3SgO: ikakomimmahki
     ikakomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3PlO: ikakomimmahki

     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1SgO: ikakomimmokit
     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1PlO: ikakomimmokinnaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: ikakomimmis
     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: ikakomimmis
     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1SgO: ikakomimmokik
     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1PlO: ikakomimmokinnaana
     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: ikakomimmok
     ikakomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: ikakomimmok

     ikakomimm+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitsikakomimmotsiiyihpinnaana , nitsikakomimmotsiiyihpinnaan ]
     
